Hawaii, session 2025, SB1290.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 328, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§328- Carcinogenic foods and products; warning labels.  (a) Beginning July 1, 2027, any carcinogenic food or product sold or distributed in the State shall have a warning label affixed to the food or product that identifies any known risk of cancer, birth defects, or reproductive harm that may result from exposure to the food or product. (b)  The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 determining the format and contents of the labels required by subsection (a). (c)  For the purposes of this section, "carcinogenic" means that the food or product, or a chemical contained in the food or product, has been classified as group 1 or group 2A by the World Health Organization's International Agency for Research on Cancer." SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $          or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the implementation and enforcement of the warning labels required by this Act. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of health for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________